Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF590.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1829SV (3) 91 da/ns S.F. 590 Section 1. Section 672.1, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. A gleaner, or a restaurant, food establishment, food 3 service establishment, school, manufacturer of foodstuffs, meat 4 or poultry establishment licensed pursuant to chapter 189A , 5 food distributor, or other person who, in good faith, donates 6 food to a charitable or nonprofit organization for ultimate 7 free distribution to needy individuals, or to the department 8 of natural resources or a county conservation board for use 9 in a free interpretive educational program, is not subject to 10 criminal or civil liability arising from the condition of the 11 food if the donor reasonably inspects the food at the time of 12 the donation and finds the food fit for human consumption. The 13 immunity provided by this subsection does not extend to a donor 14 or gleaner if damages result from the negligence, recklessness, 15 or intentional misconduct of the donor, or if the donor 16 or gleaner has, or should have had, actual or constructive 17 knowledge that the food is tainted, contaminated, or harmful to 18 the health or well-being of the ultimate recipient. 19